Maine, session 132, LD2151.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. XXX, §1,
is further amended to read:
B. Six hundred ninety-nine thousand, one hundred fifty dollars in fiscal year 2001-02
to federally qualified health centers to support the infrastructure of these programs in
providing primary care services to underserved populations. Forty-four thousand, two
hundred fifty dollars must be provided to each federally qualified health center with an
additional $8,850 for the 2nd and each additional site operated by a federally qualified
health center. For the purposes of this paragraph, "site" means a site or sites operated
by the federally qualified health center within its scope of service that meet all health
center requirements, including providing primary care services, regardless of patients'
Page 1 - 132LR2736(01)

413 ability to pay, 5 days a week with extended hours. If there is not sufficient funding to
424 meet the formula in this paragraph, the $699,150 must be allocated in proportion to the
435 formula outlined in this paragraph; and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. XXX, §2,
is further amended to read:
C. Five hundred thousand dollars, beginning with fiscal year 2015-16 and continuing
each fiscal year thereafter, to support access to primary medical, behavioral health and
dental services to residents of the State in rural and underserved communities and to
assist with provider recruitment and retention. Twenty-five thousand dollars must be
provided to each federally qualified health center.; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§1, ¶E is enacted to read:
E. Four million dollars in fiscal year 2026-27 to support access to pharmacy services
and affordably priced prescription drugs to residents of the State in rural and
underserved communities by providing funds to support federally qualified health
centers in developing or improving pharmacy services, including without limitation:
(1) Planning, designing, constructing and operating one or more licensed retail
pharmacies as part of a federally qualified health center's services;
(2) Entering into arrangements, including with one or more federally qualified
health centers, to expand the availability of prescription drugs purchased and
delivered to patients under the federal drug pricing program under Section 340B
of the federal Public Health Service Act, 42 United States Code, Section 256b; and
(3) Expanding access to prescription drugs supplied by one or more federally
qualified health centers, including without limitation by increasing the number of
locations from which patients may obtain prescription drugs, improving existing
pharmacy facilities, expanding the availability of automated pharmacy systems as
defined in Title 32, section 13702-A, subsection 1 or addressing workforce issues
related to pharmacy program planning and operation.
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §259, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Allocation of pharmacy services support funding. Each federally qualified health
center may apply for funds made available pursuant to subsection 1, paragraph E by
providing the department with a budget and plan for developing or improving pharmacy
services and access to affordably priced prescription drugs for its patients. The department
shall allocate available funds equitably among all applicants based on the cost-effectiveness
and feasibility of the proposed development or improvement of patient access to affordably
priced prescription drugs and the availability of other pharmacy services in the areas served
by a federally qualified health center applying for funds. In developing criteria for
awarding available funds, the department shall consult with and consider the
recommendations of a statewide association of federally qualified health centers. Any
available funds not awarded in fiscal year 2026-27 must be deposited in a nonlapsing
account from which awards may be made in subsequent fiscal periods for the purposes set
forth in subsection 1, paragraph E.
Upon issuance of each award pursuant to this subsection, the department shall promptly
implement a change in scope adjustment pursuant to section 3174-V, subsection 4 to reflect
Page 2 - 132LR2736(01)

414 the ongoing costs for the federally qualified health center receiving the grant of operating
425 expanded or improved pharmacy services.
Sec. 5. Implementation. The Department of Health and Human Services shall
publish a schedule and instructions for the content of applications and criteria for
determining awards for the pharmacy services support program described in this
legislation. The department's schedule must ensure that initial awards of funding be made
no later than December 15, 2026 and must ensure that applicants have no less than 60 days
to prepare and submit applications after instructions for the content of applications and
criteria for selection have been published. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, the department shall ensure that a majority of the persons selected to evaluate the
applications have substantial training or experience in the operation and management of a
federally qualified health center by including among those evaluating the applications
volunteers recommended by a statewide association of federally qualified health centers.
Sec. 6. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Maine Center for Disease Control and Prevention 0143
Initiative: Provides one-time funding for the Maine Center for Disease Control and
Prevention to support federally qualified health centers in developing and expanding
pharmacy services and access to affordably priced prescription drugs for the patients of
such health centers.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $4,000,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $4,000,000
2262 Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
2273 takes effect when approved.